Maine, session 132, LD907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4353, sub-§4-A, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 342, §1, is
amended to read:
B. If authorized by the zoning ordinance establishing the board, the board may grant
a variance to an owner of a dwelling who resides in the dwelling and who is responsible
to transport a person with a permanent disability for the construction of a place of
storage and parking for a noncommercial vehicle owned by that person and no other
purpose used to transport a person with a permanent disability. The width and length
of the structure may not be larger than 2 times the width and length of the
noncommercial vehicle. The owner shall submit proposed plans for the structure with
the request for the variance pursuant to this paragraph to the board.
The person with the permanent disability shall prove by a preponderance of the
evidence that the person's disability is permanent.
For purposes of this paragraph, "noncommercial vehicle" means a motor vehicle as
defined in Title 29‑A, section 101, subsection 42 with a gross vehicle weight of no
more than 6,000 pounds, bearing a disability registration plate issued pursuant to Title
29‑A, section 521 and owned by the person with the permanent disability.
Page 1 - 132LR2377(03)